Massachusetts, session 194th, S3169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Pursuant to section 5A of chapter 3 of the general laws, notwithstanding 
any general or special law to the contrary, the commonwealth of Massachusetts, acting by and 
through its department of transportation, may take for highway purposes, certain parcels of land 
located in Woburn and Burlington, held in trust by the city of Boston department of Treasury, 
being temporary construction areas of 4,603 square feet and permanent easements of 8,917 
square feet and shown on a plan of land entitled, “Massachusetts Department of Transportation 

of 2 7 Highway Division Intersection Improvement Project Cambridge Road at South Bedford Street 
and Bedford Road in the city and town of Woburn/Burlington, Middlesex County Preliminary 
Right of Way Plans”, to be filed with the chief engineer of the highway division of the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation and recorded with the Middlesex north registry of 
deeds. 
SECTION 2. In anticipation of and as planned mitigation for the takings described in 
section 1 of this act, and to ensure no net loss of land subject to article 97 of the amendments to 
the constitution of the commonwealth, during the May 25, 2025 approval of a special permit to 
Jumbo Self Storage, LLC - Jumbo Capital Management for land being located at 7 Wheeler 
Road in Burlington, Massachusetts and shown on Assessor's Map 52 as Parcels 4 and 6, the town 
of Burlington required that land be set aside for future improvements to the intersection of 
Cambridge Road at South Bedford Street and Bedford Road to satisfy Article 97. The town of 
Burlington further accepted a conservation restriction from Wheeler Self Storage, LLC on the 
Wheeler Road property containing approximately 9 acres, recorded with the Middlesex south 
registry of deeds at Book 78014, Page 433. As described in conditions G and H of that certain 
special permit decision granted by the town of Burlington planning board recorded with the 
Middlesex south registry of deeds at book 71169 and page 469, said conveyance was specifically 
intended to be mitigation for the transfer described in section 1. 
SECTION 3. The department of transportation shall assume all costs associated with 
engineering, surveys, appraisals, deed preparation and other expenses necessary to execute the 
takings authorized by this act. 
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.